Rhode Island statutes. Title 7 Corporations, Associations, and Partnerships
Chapter 12.1 Uniform Partnership Act [Effective January 1, 2023.]
7-12.1-504.
Charging order. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

On application by a judgment creditor of a partner or transferee, a court may enter a charging order against the transferable interest of the judgment debtor for the unsatisfied amount of the judgment. A charging order constitutes a lien on a judgment debtor’s transferable interest and requires the partnership to pay over to the person to which the charging order was issued any distribution that otherwise would be paid to the judgment debtor.

To the extent necessary to effectuate the collection of distributions pursuant to a charging order in effect under subsection (a) of this section, the court may:

Appoint a receiver of the distributions subject to the charging order, with the power to make all inquiries the judgment debtor might have made; and

Make all other orders necessary to give effect to the charging order.

Upon a showing that distributions under a charging order will not pay the judgment debt within a reasonable time, the court may foreclose the lien and order the sale of the transferable interest. The purchaser at the foreclosure sale obtains only the transferable interest, does not thereby become a partner, and is subject to §

7-12.1-503

.

At any time before foreclosure under subsection (c) of this section, the partner or transferee whose transferable interest is subject to a charging order under subsection (a) of this section may extinguish the charging order by satisfying the judgment and filing a certified copy of the satisfaction with the court that issued the charging order.

At any time before foreclosure under subsection (c) of this section, a partnership or one or more partners whose transferable interests are not subject to the charging order may pay to the judgment creditor the full amount due under the judgment and thereby succeed to the rights of the judgment creditor, including the charging order.

This chapter does not deprive any partner or transferee of the benefit of any exemption law applicable to the transferable interest of the partner or transferee.

This section provides the exclusive remedy by which a person seeking in the capacity of a judgment creditor to enforce a judgment against a partner or transferee may satisfy the judgment from the judgment debtor’s transferable interest.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-505.
Power of legal representative of deceased partner. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a partner dies, the deceased partner’s legal representative may exercise:

The rights of a transferee provided in §

7-12.1-503(c)

; and

For purposes of settling the estate, the rights the deceased partner had under §

7-12.1-408

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-601.
Events causing dissociation. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person is dissociated as a partner when:

The partnership knows or has notice of the person’s express will to withdraw as a partner, but, if the person has specified a withdrawal date later than the date the partnership knew or had notice, on that later date;

An event stated in the partnership agreement as causing the person’s dissociation occurs;

The person is expelled as a partner pursuant to the partnership agreement;

The person is expelled as a partner by the affirmative vote or consent of all the other partners if:

It is unlawful to carry on the partnership business with the person as a partner;

There has been a transfer of all of the person’s transferable interest in the partnership, other than:

A transfer for security purposes; or

A charging order in effect under §

7-12.1-504

which has not been foreclosed;

The person is an entity and:

The partnership notifies the person that it will be expelled as a partner because the person has filed a statement of dissolution or the equivalent, the person has been administratively dissolved, the person’s charter or the equivalent has been revoked, or the person’s right to conduct business has been suspended by the person’s jurisdiction of formation; and

Not later than ninety (90) days after the notification, the statement of dissolution or the equivalent has not been withdrawn, rescinded, or revoked, or the person’s charter or the equivalent or right to conduct business has not been reinstated; or

The person is an unincorporated entity that has been dissolved and whose activities and affairs are being wound up;

On application by the partnership or another partner, the person is expelled as a partner by judicial order because the person:

Has engaged or is engaging in wrongful conduct that has affected adversely and materially, or will affect adversely and materially, the partnership’s business;

Has committed willfully or persistently, or is committing willfully or persistently, a material breach of the partnership agreement or a duty or obligation under §

7-12.1-409

; or

Has engaged or is engaging in conduct relating to the partnership’s business which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the business with the person as a partner;

The person:

Becomes a debtor in bankruptcy;

Signs an assignment for the benefit of creditors; or

Seeks, consents to, or acquiesces in the appointment of a trustee, receiver, or liquidator of the person or of all or substantially all the person’s property;

In the case of an individual:

The individual dies;

A guardian or general conservator for the individual is appointed; or

A court orders that the individual has otherwise become incapable of performing the individual’s duties as a partner under this chapter or the partnership agreement;

In the case of a person that is a testamentary or inter vivos trust or is acting as a partner by virtue of being a trustee of such a trust, the trust’s entire transferable interest in the partnership is distributed;

In the case of a person that is an estate or is acting as a partner by virtue of being a personal representative of an estate, the estate’s entire transferable interest in the partnership is distributed;

In the case of a person that is not an individual, the existence of the person terminates;

The partnership participates in a merger under Article 11 of this chapter and:

The partnership is not the surviving entity; or

Otherwise as a result of the merger, the person ceases to be a partner;

The partnership participates in an interest exchange under Article 11 of this chapter and, as a result of the interest exchange, the person ceases to be a partner;

The partnership participates in a conversion under Article 11 of this chapter;

The partnership participates in a domestication under Article 11 of this chapter and, as a result of the domestication, the person ceases to be a partner; or

The partnership dissolves and completes winding up.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-602.
Power to dissociate as partner — Wrongful dissociation. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person has the power to dissociate as a partner at any time, rightfully or wrongfully, by withdrawing as a partner by express will under §

7-12.1-601(1)

.

A person’s dissociation as a partner is wrongful only if the dissociation:

Is in breach of an express provision of the partnership agreement; or

In the case of a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking, occurs before the expiration of the term or the completion of the undertaking and:

The person withdraws as a partner by express will, unless the withdrawal follows not later than ninety (90) days after another person’s dissociation by death or otherwise under §

7-12.1-601(6)

through (10) or wrongful dissociation under this subsection;

The person is expelled as a partner by judicial order under §

7-12.1-601(5)

;

The person is dissociated under §

7-12.1-601(6)

; or

In the case of a person that is not a trust other than a business trust, an estate, or an individual, the person is expelled or otherwise dissociated because it willfully dissolved or terminated.

A person that wrongfully dissociates as a partner is liable to the partnership and to the other partners for damages caused by the dissociation. The liability is in addition to any debt, obligation, or other liability of the partner to the partnership or the other partners.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-603.
Effect of dissociation. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a person’s dissociation results in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business, Article 8 of this chapter applies; otherwise, Article 7 of this chapter applies.

If a person is dissociated as a partner:

The person’s right to participate in the management and conduct of the partnership’s business terminates, except as otherwise provided in §

7-12.1-802

(c); and

The person’s duties and obligations under §

7-12.1-409

end with regard to matters arising and events occurring after the person’s dissociation, except to the extent the partner participates in winding up the partnership’s business pursuant to §

7-12.1-802

.

A person’s dissociation does not of itself discharge the person from any debt, obligation, or other liability to the partnership or the other partners which the person incurred while a partner.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-701.
Purchase of interest of person dissociated as partner. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a person is dissociated as a partner without the dissociation resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business under §

7-12.1-801

, the partnership shall cause the person’s interest in the partnership to be purchased for a buyout price determined pursuant to subsection (b) of this section.

The buyout price of the interest of a person dissociated as a partner is the amount that would have been distributable to the person under §

7-12.1-806(b)

if, on the date of dissociation, the assets of the partnership were sold and the partnership were wound up, with the sale price equal to the greater of:

The liquidation value; or

The value based on a sale of the entire business as a going concern without the person.

Interest accrues on the buyout price from the date of dissociation to the date of payment, but damages for wrongful dissociation under §

7-12.1-602(b)

, and all other amounts owing, whether or not presently due, from the person dissociated as a partner to the partnership, must be offset against the buyout price.

A partnership shall defend, indemnify, and hold harmless a person dissociated as a partner whose interest is being purchased against all partnership liabilities, whether incurred before or after the dissociation, except liabilities incurred by an act of the person under §

7-12.1-702

.

If no agreement for the purchase of the interest of a person dissociated as a partner is reached not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after a written demand for payment, the partnership shall pay, or cause to be paid, in money to the person the amount the partnership estimates to be the buyout price and accrued interest, reduced by any offsets and accrued interest under subsection (c) of this section.

If a deferred payment is authorized under subsection (h) of this section, the partnership may tender a written offer to pay the amount it estimates to be the buyout price and accrued interest, reduced by any offsets under subsection (c) of this section, stating the time of payment, the amount and type of security for payment, and the other terms and conditions of the obligation.

The payment or tender required by subsection (e) or (f) of this section must be accompanied by the following:

A statement of partnership assets and liabilities as of the date of dissociation;

The latest available partnership balance sheet and income statement, if any;

An explanation of how the estimated amount of the payment was calculated; and

Written notice that the payment is in full satisfaction of the obligation to purchase unless, not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the written notice, the person dissociated as a partner commences an action to determine the buyout price, any offsets under subsection (c) of this section, or other terms of the obligation to purchase.

A person that wrongfully dissociates as a partner before the expiration of a definite term or the completion of a particular undertaking is not entitled to payment of any part of the buyout price until the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, unless the person establishes to the satisfaction of the court that earlier payment will not cause undue hardship to the business of the partnership. A deferred payment must be adequately secured and bear interest.

A person dissociated as a partner may maintain an action against the partnership, pursuant to § 7-12.1-410(b)(2), to determine the buyout price of that person’s interest, any offsets under subsection (c) of this section, or other terms of the obligation to purchase. The action must be commenced not later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the partnership has tendered payment or an offer to pay or within one year after written demand for payment if no payment or offer to pay is tendered. The court shall determine the buyout price of the person’s interest, any offset due under subsection (c) of this section, and accrued interest, and enter judgment for any additional payment or refund. If deferred payment is authorized under subsection (h) of this section, the court shall also determine the security for payment and other terms of the obligation to purchase. The court may assess reasonable attorneys’ fees and the fees and expenses of appraisers or other experts for a party to the action, in amounts the court finds equitable, against a party that the court finds acted arbitrarily, vexatiously, or not in good faith. The finding may be based on the partnership’s failure to tender payment or an offer to pay or to comply with subsection (g) of this section.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-702.
Power to bind and liability of person dissociated as partner. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

After a person is dissociated as a partner without the dissociation resulting in a dissolution and winding up of the partnership business and before the partnership is merged out of existence, converted, or domesticated under Article 11, or dissolved, the partnership is bound by an act of the person only if:

The act would have bound the partnership under §

7-12.1-301

before dissociation; and

At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

Less than two (2) years has passed since the dissociation; and

The other party does not know or have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a partner.

If a partnership is bound under subsection (a) of this section, the person dissociated as a partner which caused the partnership to be bound is liable:

To the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the obligation incurred under subsection (a) of this section; and

If a partner or another person dissociated as a partner is liable for the obligation, to the partner or other person for any damage caused to the partner or other person arising from the liability.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-703.
Liability of person dissociated as partner to other persons. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a person dissociated as a partner is not liable for a partnership obligation incurred after dissociation.

A person that is dissociated as a partner is liable on a transaction entered into by the partnership after the dissociation only if:

A partner would be liable on the transaction; and

At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

Less than two (2) years has passed since the dissociation; and

The other party does not have knowledge or notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a partner.

By agreement with a creditor of a partnership and the partnership, a person dissociated as a partner may be released from liability for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership.

A person dissociated as a partner is released from liability for a debt, obligation, or other liability of the partnership if the partnership’s creditor, with knowledge or notice of the person’s dissociation but without the person’s consent, agrees to a material alteration in the nature or time of payment of the debt, obligation, or other liability.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-704.
Statement of dissociation. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A person dissociated as a partner or the partnership may deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of dissociation stating the name of the partnership and that the person has dissociated from the partnership.

A statement of dissociation is a limitation on the authority of a person dissociated as a partner for the purposes of §

7-12.1-303

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-705.
Continued use of partnership name. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Continued use of a partnership name, or the name of a person dissociated as a partner as part of the partnership name, by partners continuing the business does not of itself make the person dissociated as a partner liable for an obligation of the partners or the partnership continuing the business.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-801.
Events causing dissolution. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership is dissolved, and its business must be wound up, upon the occurrence of any of the following:

In a partnership at will, the partnership knows or has notice of a person’s express will to withdraw as a partner, other than a partner that has dissociated under §

7-12.1-601(2)

through (10), but, if the person has specified a withdrawal date later than the date the partnership knew or had notice, on the later date;

In a partnership for a definite term or particular undertaking:

Within ninety (90) days after a person’s dissociation by death or otherwise under §

7-12.1-601(6)

through (10) or wrongful dissociation under §

7-12.1-602(b)

, the affirmative vote or consent of at least half of the remaining partners to wind up the partnership business, for which purpose a person’s rightful dissociation pursuant to §

7-12.1-602(b)

(2)(i) constitutes that partner’s consent to wind up the partnership business;

The affirmative vote or consent of all the partners to wind up the partnership business; or

The expiration of the term or the completion of the undertaking;

An event or circumstance that the partnership agreement states causes dissolution;

On application by a partner, the entry by the superior court of an order dissolving the partnership on the grounds that:

The conduct of all or substantially all the partnership’s business is unlawful;

The economic purpose of the partnership is likely to be unreasonably frustrated;

Another partner has engaged in conduct relating to the partnership business which makes it not reasonably practicable to carry on the business in partnership with that partner; or

It is otherwise not reasonably practicable to carry on the partnership business in conformity with the partnership agreement;

On application by a transferee, the entry by the superior court of an order dissolving the partnership on the ground that it is equitable to wind up the partnership business:

After the expiration of the term or completion of the undertaking, if the partnership was for a definite term or particular undertaking at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order that gave rise to the transfer; or

At any time, if the partnership was a partnership at will at the time of the transfer or entry of the charging order that gave rise to the transfer; or

The passage of ninety (90) consecutive days during which the partnership does not have at least two (2) partners.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-802.
Winding up. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A dissolved partnership shall wind up its business and, except as otherwise provided in §

7-12.1-803

, the partnership continues after dissolution only for the purpose of winding up.

In winding up its business, the partnership:

Shall discharge the partnership’s debts, obligations, and other liabilities, settle and close the partnership’s business, and marshal and distribute the assets of the partnership; and

May:

Deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of dissolution stating the name of the partnership and that the partnership is dissolved;

Preserve the partnership business and property as a going concern for a reasonable time;

Prosecute and defend actions and proceedings, whether civil, criminal, or administrative;

Transfer the partnership’s property;

Settle disputes by mediation or arbitration;

Deliver to the secretary of state for filing a statement of termination stating the name of the partnership and that the partnership is terminated; and

Perform other acts necessary or appropriate to the winding up.

A person whose dissociation as a partner resulted in dissolution may participate in winding up as if still a partner, unless the dissociation was wrongful.

If a dissolved partnership does not have a partner and no person has the right to participate in winding up under subsection (c) of this section, the personal or legal representative of the last person to have been a partner may wind up the partnership’s business. If the representative does not exercise that right, a person to wind up the partnership’s business may be appointed by the affirmative vote or consent of transferees owning a majority of the rights to receive distributions at the time the consent is to be effective. A person appointed under this subsection has the powers of a partner under §

7-12.1-804

but is not liable for the debts, obligations, and other liabilities of the partnership solely by reason of having or exercising those powers or otherwise acting to wind up the partnership’s business.

On the application of any partner or person entitled under subsection (c) of this section to participate in winding up, the superior court may order judicial supervision of the winding up of a dissolved partnership, including the appointment of a person to wind up the partnership’s business, if:

The partnership does not have a partner and within a reasonable time following the dissolution no person has been appointed under subsection (d) of this section; or

The applicant establishes other good cause.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-803.
Rescinding dissolution. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership may rescind its dissolution, unless a statement of termination applicable to the partnership has become effective or the superior court has entered an order under §

7-12.1-801(4)

or (5) dissolving the partnership.

Rescinding dissolution under this section requires:

The affirmative vote or consent of each partner; and

If the partnership has filed with the secretary of state a statement of dissolution and:

The statement has not become effective, delivery to the secretary of state for filing of a statement of withdrawal under §

7-12.1-115

applicable to the statement of dissolution; or

The statement of dissolution has become effective, delivery to the secretary of state for filing of a statement of rescission stating the name of the partnership and that dissolution has been rescinded under this section.

If a partnership rescinds its dissolution:

The partnership resumes carrying on its business as if dissolution had never occurred;

Subject to subsection (c)(3) of this section, any liability incurred by the partnership after the dissolution and before the rescission has become effective is determined as if dissolution had never occurred; and

The rights of a third party arising out of conduct in reliance on the dissolution before the third party knew or had notice of the rescission may not be adversely affected.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-804.
Power to bind partnership after dissolution. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A partnership is bound by a partner’s act after dissolution which:

Is appropriate for winding up the partnership business; or

Would have bound the partnership under §

7-12.1-301

before dissolution if, at the time the other party enters into the transaction, the other party does not know or have notice of the dissolution.

A person dissociated as a partner binds a partnership through an act occurring after dissolution if:

At the time the other party enters into the transaction:

Less than two (2) years has passed since the dissociation; and

The other party does not know or have notice of the dissociation and reasonably believes that the person is a partner; and

The act:

Is appropriate for winding up the partnership’s business; or

Would have bound the partnership under §

7-12.1-301

before dissolution and at the time the other party enters into the transaction the other party does not know or have notice of the dissolution.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-805.
Liability after dissolution of partner and person dissociated as partner. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a partner having knowledge of the dissolution causes a partnership to incur an obligation under §

7-12.1-804(a)

by an act that is not appropriate for winding up the partnership business, the partner is liable:

To the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the obligation; and

If another partner or person dissociated as a partner is liable for the obligation, to that other partner or person for any damage caused to that other partner or person arising from the liability.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this section, if a person dissociated as a partner causes a partnership to incur an obligation under §

7-12.1-804(b)

, the person is liable:

To the partnership for any damage caused to the partnership arising from the obligation; and

If a partner or another person dissociated as a partner is liable for the obligation, to the partner or other person for any damage caused to the partner or other person arising from the obligation.

A person dissociated as a partner is not liable under subsection (b) of this section if:

Section

7-12.1-802(c)

permits the person to participate in winding up; and

The act that causes the partnership to be bound under §

7-12.1-804(b)

is appropriate for winding up the partnership’s business.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-806.
Disposition of assets in winding up — When contributions required. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

In winding up its business, a partnership shall apply its assets, including the contributions required by this section, to discharge the partnership’s obligations to creditors, including partners that are creditors.

After a partnership complies with subsection (a) of this section, any surplus must be distributed in the following order, subject to any charging order in effect under §

7-12.1-504

:

To each person owning a transferable interest that reflects contributions made and not previously returned, an amount equal to the value of the unreturned contributions; and

Among persons owning transferable interests in proportion to their respective rights to share in distributions immediately before the dissolution of the partnership.

If a partnership’s assets are insufficient to satisfy all its obligations under subsection (a) of this section, with respect to each unsatisfied obligation incurred when the partnership was not a limited liability partnership, the following rules apply:

Each person that was a partner when the obligation was incurred and that has not been released from the obligation under §

7-12.1-703(c)

and (d) shall contribute to the partnership for the purpose of enabling the partnership to satisfy the obligation. The contribution due from each of those persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of a partner in effect for each of those persons when the obligation was incurred.

If a person does not contribute the full amount required under subsection (c)(1) of this section with respect to an unsatisfied obligation of the partnership, the other persons required to contribute by subsection (c)(1) of this section on account of the obligation shall contribute the additional amount necessary to discharge the obligation. The additional contribution due from each of those other persons is in proportion to the right to receive distributions in the capacity of a partner in effect for each of those other persons when the obligation was incurred.

If a person does not make the additional contribution required by subsection (c)(2) of this section, further additional contributions are determined and due in the same manner as provided in that subsection.

A person that makes an additional contribution under subsection (c)(2) or (c)(3) of this section may recover from any person whose failure to contribute under subsection (c)(1) or (c)(2) of this section necessitated the additional contribution. A person may not recover under this subsection more than the amount additionally contributed. A person’s liability under this subsection may not exceed the amount the person failed to contribute.

If a partnership does not have sufficient surplus to comply with subsection (b)(1) of this section, any surplus must be distributed among the owners of transferable interests in proportion to the value of the respective unreturned contributions.

All distributions made under subsections (b) and (c) of this section must be paid in money.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-807.
Known claims against dissolved limited liability partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this section, a dissolved limited liability partnership may give notice of a known claim under subsection (b) of this section, which has the effect provided in subsection (c) of this section.

A dissolved limited liability partnership may in a record notify its known claimants of the dissolution. The notice must:

Specify the information required to be included in a claim;

State that a claim must be in writing and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

State the deadline for receipt of a claim, which may not be less than one hundred twenty (120) days after the date the notice is received by the claimant;

State that the claim will be barred if not received by the deadline; and

Unless the partnership has been throughout its existence a limited liability partnership, state that the barring of a claim against the partnership will also bar any corresponding claim against any partner or person dissociated as a partner which is based on §

7-12.1-306

.

A claim against a dissolved limited liability partnership is barred if the requirements of subsection (b) of this section are met and:

The claim is not received by the specified deadline; or

If the claim is timely received but rejected by the limited liability partnership:

The partnership causes the claimant to receive a notice in a record stating that the claim is rejected and will be barred unless the claimant commences an action against the partnership to enforce the claim not later than ninety (90) days after the claimant receives the notice; and

The claimant does not commence the required action not later than ninety (90) days after the claimant receives the notice.

This section does not apply to a claim based on an event occurring after the date of dissolution or a liability that on that date is contingent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-808.
Other claims against dissolved limited liability partnership. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A dissolved limited liability partnership may publish notice of its dissolution and request persons having claims against the partnership to present them in accordance with the notice.

A notice under subsection (a) of this section must:

Be published at least once in a newspaper of general circulation;

Describe the information required to be contained in a claim, state that the claim must be in writing, and provide a mailing address to which the claim is to be sent;

State that a claim against the partnership is barred unless an action to enforce the claim is commenced not later than three (3) years after publication of the notice; and

Unless the partnership has been throughout its existence a limited liability partnership, state that the barring of a claim against the partnership will also bar any corresponding claim against any partner or person dissociated as a partner which is based on §

7-12.1-306

.

If a dissolved limited liability partnership publishes a notice in accordance with subsection (b) of this section, the claim of each of the following claimants is barred unless the claimant commences an action to enforce the claim against the partnership not later than three (3) years after the publication date of the notice:

A claimant that did not receive notice in a record under §

7-12.1-807

;

A claimant whose claim was timely sent to the partnership but not acted on; and

A claimant whose claim is contingent at, or based on an event occurring after, the date of dissolution.

A claim not barred under this section or §

7-12.1-807

may be enforced:

Against a dissolved limited liability partnership, to the extent of its undistributed assets;

Except as otherwise provided in §

7-12.1-809

, if assets of the partnership have been distributed after dissolution, against a partner or transferee to the extent of that person’s proportionate share of the claim or of the partnership’s assets distributed to the partner or transferee after dissolution, whichever is less, but a person’s total liability for all claims under this subsection may not exceed the total amount of assets distributed to the person after dissolution; and

Against any person liable on the claim under §§

7-12.1-306

,

7-12.1-703

, and

7-12.1-805

.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-809.
Court proceedings. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

A dissolved limited liability partnership that has published a notice under §

7-12.1-808

may file an application with the Providence County superior court for a determination of the amount and form of security to be provided for payment of claims that are reasonably expected to arise after the date of dissolution based on facts known to the partnership and:

At the time of the application:

Are contingent; or

Have not been made known to the partnership; or

Are based on an event occurring after the date of dissolution.

Security is not required for any claim that is or is reasonably anticipated to be barred under §

7-12.1-807

.

Not later than ten (10) days after the filing of an application under subsection (a) of this section, the dissolved limited liability partnership shall give notice of the proceeding to each claimant holding a contingent claim known to the partnership.

In any proceeding under this section, the court may appoint a guardian ad litem to represent all claimants whose identities are unknown. The reasonable fees and expenses of the guardian, including all reasonable expert witness fees, must be paid by the dissolved limited liability partnership.

A dissolved limited liability partnership that provides security in the amount and form ordered by the court under subsection (a) of this section satisfies the partnership’s obligations with respect to claims that are contingent, have not been made known to the partnership, or are based on an event occurring after the date of dissolution, and such claims may not be enforced against a partner or transferee on account of assets received in liquidation.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.

7-12.1-810.
Liability of partner and person dissociated as partner when claim against partnership barred. [Effective January 1, 2023.]

If a claim against a dissolved partnership is barred under §

7-12.1-807

,

7-12.1-808

, or

7-12.1-809

, any corresponding claim under §

7-12.1-306

,

7-12.1-703

, or

7-12.1-805

is also barred.

History of Section.

P.L. 2022, ch. 123, § 2, effective January 1, 2023; P.L. 2022, ch. 124, § 2, effective January 1, 2023.